New York, session 2025-2026, S1593.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1045-j of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 3-a to read as follows: 3 3-a. Notwithstanding any other law, the water board may provide a ten 4 percent discount for all senior citizens and veterans from the fee, 5 rate, rent or other charge established pursuant to this section. For 6 purposes of this subdivision, "senior citizen" shall mean a resident of 7 the city who is age sixty-five or older; and "veteran" shall mean a 8 resident of the city who served in and who received an honorable or 9 general discharge from the United States army, navy, air force, marine 10 corps, coast guard and/or reserves thereof, and/or the army national 11 guard, air national guard, New York guard or New York naval militia. 12 The water board may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry 13 out the purposes of this subdivision. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00562-01-5